Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2608
Effect of issuance of certificate of organization.

(1) Upon the issuance of the certificate of organization, the limited liability company shall be considered organized unless a delayed effective date is stated in the articles of organization. The certificate of organization shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the members have been complied with and that the limited liability company has been legally organized pursuant to the Limited Liability Company Act except as against this state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of organization or for involuntary dissolution of the limited liability company.

(2) A limited liability company shall not transact business or incur indebtedness, except business or indebtedness that is incidental to its organization or to obtaining subscriptions for or payment of contributions, until the Secretary of State has issued a certificate of organization or, if later, any delayed effective date of organization stated in the articles of organization.

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 631, § 5.
January 1, 2013